Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.515

Disability leave supplement for law enforcement officers and firefighters—Time limitation.

The disability leave supplement provided by RCW 41.04.500 through 41.04.530 shall continue as long as the employee is receiving benefits under RCW 51.32.090, up to a maximum of six months from the date of the injury or illness.

[ 1985 c 462 s 4.]

NOTES:

Program and fiscal review—1985 c 462: See note following RCW 41.04.500.